Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.130

Adoption of rules and regulations.

The board of county commissioners may adopt by resolution reasonable rules and regulations governing the construction, maintenance, operation, use, connection and service of the system of sewerage and/or water.

[ 1967 c 72 s 13.]